verb.permissive.che.lexd
LEXICON RegularPermissiveVerbStems
агӀордаккха:агӀордаккхий
агӀopдала:агӀордалий
агӀopдаха:агӀордахий
агӀордийла:агӀордийлий
агӀорхьажо:агӀорхьажадай
агӀорхьажа:агӀорхьажий
агӀорхьежо:агӀорхьежадай
агӀорхьежа:агӀорхьежий
агӀоръэха:агӀоръэхий
аздан:аздай
аздала:аздалий
айдан:айдай
айдала:айдалий
айкхдала:айкхдалий
айкхдийла:айкхдийлий
акхадаккха:акхадаккхий
акхадала:акхадалий
акхадаха:акхадахий
акхадийла:акхадийлий
акхадовла:акхадовлий
акхахьажа:акхахьажий
акхахьежа:акхахьежий
акха:акхий
анддан:анддай
анддаккха:анддаккхий
анддала:анддалий
анддала:анддалий
анддаха:анддахий
анддийла:анддийлий
анддовла:анддовлий
арадаккха:арадаккхий
арадала:арадалий
арадаха:арадахий
арадаха:арадахий
арадийла:арадийлий
арадовда:арадовдий
арадовла:арадовлий
араида:араидий
аракхийдо:аракхийдадай
аракхийда:аракхийдий
аракхийсадала:аракхийсадалий
аракхийса:аракхийсий
аракховдо:аракховдадай
аракховда:аракховдий
аракхоссадала:аракхоссадалий
аракхосса:аракхоссий
аракъада:аракъадий
аракъеда:аракъедий
аралалла:аралаллий
аралахка:аралахкий
аралелла:аралеллий
аралелха:аралелхий
аралехка:аралехкий
арахеца:арахеций
арахьададала:арахьададалий
арахьада:арахьадий
арахьажо:арахьажадай
арахьажадала:арахьажадалий
арахьажа:арахьажий
арахьакхадала:арахьакхадалий
арахьакха:арахьакхий
арахьалха:арахьалхий
арахьежа:арахьежий
арахьийса:арахьийсий
арахьовсадала:арахьовсадалий
арахьовса:арахьовсий
араэккхадала:араэккхадалий
араэккха:араэккхий
араэха:араэхий
аркъалдаккхадала:аркъалдаккхадалий
аркъалдаккха:аркъалдаккхий
аркъалдаладала:аркъалдаладалий
аркъалдала:аркъалдалий
аркъалдахадала:аркъалдахадалий
аркъалдаха:аркъалдахий
аркъалдеттадала:аркъалдеттадалий
аркъалдетта:аркъалдеттий
аркъалдийладала:аркъалдийладалий
аркъалдийла:аркъалдийлий
аркъалдовладала:аркъалдовладалий
аркъалдовла:аркъалдовлий
аркъалкхета:аркъалкхетий
аркъалсаттадала:аркъалсаттадалий
аркъалсатта:аркъалсаттий
аркъалсеттадала:аркъалсеттадалий
аркъалсетта:аркъалсеттий
аркъалтаса:аркъалтасий
аркъалтаӀадала:аркъалтаӀадалий
аркъалтаӀа:аркъалтаӀий
аркъалтеӀадала:аркъалтеӀадалий
аркъалтеӀа:аркъалтеӀий
аркъалтийсадала:аркъалтийсадалий
аркъалтийса:аркъалтийсий
аркъалтохадала:аркъалтохадалий
аркъалтоха:аркъалтохий
артдан:артдай
артдала:артдалий
ахдаккхадала:ахдаккхадалий
ахдаккха:ахдаккхий
ахдала:ахдалий
ахдаха:ахдахий
ахдаха:ахдахий
ахдийла:ахдийлий
ао:аабай[agr]
аго:агабай[agr]
базбан:базбай
байбан:байбай
акхо:акхабай[agr]
акъо:акъабай[agr]
бакъдан:бакъдай
ало:алабай[agr]
алло:аллабай[agr]
алхо:алхабай[agr]
аржо:аржабай[agr]
арсто:арстабай[agr]
ассо:ассабай[agr]
бассабала:бассабалий
бато:батабай
батӀо:батӀабай
ахо:ахабай[agr]
ахо:ахабай[agr]
бахбан:бахбай
бахбала:бахбалий
бахко:бахкабай
бахкабала:бахкабалий
ахчо:ахчабай[agr]
ахьо:ахьабай[agr]
бацо:бацабай
бацбан:бацбай
башо:башабай
его:егабай[agr]
еко:екабай[agr]
ело:елабай[agr]
елхо:елхабай[agr]
ерзо:ерзабай[agr]
бехдан:бехдай
бехдала:бехдалий
ижо:ижабай[agr]
ийшо:ийшабай[agr]
билгалдан:билгалдай
биссо:биссабай
бицбан:бицбай
боддан:боддай
божо:божабай
оло:олабай[agr]
оссо:оссабай[agr]
бохо:бохабай
бохбан:бохбай
бохбала:бохбалий
зо:забай[agr_u]
букардола:букардолий
букъбан:букъбай
ла:лаба[agr_u]
сто:стабай[agr_u]
буткъабан:буткъабай
бухабаха:бухабахий
аго:агавай[agr]
вагарван:вагарвай
вадо:вадавай
вазван:вазвай
вайван:вайвай
акхо:акхавай[agr]
акъо:акъавай[agr]
ало:алавай[agr]
алло:аллавай[agr]
алхо:алхавай[agr]
аржо:аржавай[agr]
арсто:арставай[agr]
ассо:ассавай[agr]
вассавала:вассавалий
ватӀо:ватӀавай
ахо:ахавай[agr]
вахван:вахвай
вахко:вахкавай
вахкавала:вахкавалий
ахчо:ахчавай[agr]
ахьо:ахьавай[agr]
вацо:вацавай
вацван:вацвай
вашо:вашавай
аша:аший[agr]
его:егавай[agr]
веддан:веддай
веддала:веддалий
еко:екавай[agr]
екха:екхий[agr]
ело:елавай[agr]
елхо:елхавай[agr]
ерзо:ерзавай[agr]
ижо:ижавай[agr]
виссо:виссавай
вицван:вицвай
вожо:вожавай
оло:олавай[agr]
оссо:оссавай[agr]
вохо:вохавай
вохван:вохвай
зо:завай[agr_u]
вукъван:вукъвай
вукъвала:вукъвалий
сто:ставай[agr_u]
вуткъаван:вуткъавай
вуткъавала:вуткъавалий
вухаваха:вухавахий
горгдан:горгдай
гоьдаккха:гоьдаккхий
гоьдала:гоьдалий
гулдан:гулдай
гулдала:гулдалий
гучудаккхадала:гучудаккхадалий
гучудаккха:гучудаккхий
гучудала:гучудалий
гучудаха:гучудахий
гучудийла:гучудийлий
гучудовла:гучудовлий
гӀалаташдаха:гӀалаташдахий
гӀалатдаккха:гӀалатдаккхий
гӀалатдала:гӀалатдалий
гӀалатдийла:гӀалатдийлий
гӀатто:гӀаттадай
гӀелдан:гӀелдай
гӀелдала:гӀелдалий
гӀерто:гӀертадай
гӀитто:гӀиттадай
гӀовтто:гӀовттадай
гӀоро:гӀорадай
гӀopто:гӀортадай
емалдан:емалдай
жимдан:жимдай
ийзо:ийзадай
ийзадала:ийзадалий
имадиллаобратитьвмусульманство:имадиллий
инзардаккха:инзардаккхий
инзардала:инзардалий
ирдан:ирдай
кагдан:кагдай
кагдала:кагдалий
кадаккха:кадаккхий
кадала:кадалий
карадан:карадаий
каро:карадай
карадало:карадаладай
карадала:карадалий
карадаха:карадахий
карадерза:карадерзий
караӀамо:караӀамадай
караӀама:караӀамий
кархдала:кархдалий
карчо:карчадай
карча:карчий
катоха:катохий
кахьакха:кахьакхий
кахьекха:кахьекхий
качдан:качдай
качдала:качдалий
кегадала:кегадай
кего:кегадалий
кегдан:кегдай
керчо:керчадай
керча:керчий
кечдан:кечдай
кечдала:кечдалий
курадала:курадалий
кхагаррдола:кхагардолий
кхайкхо:кхайкхадай
кхалхо:кхалхадай
кхардо:кхардадай
кхачо:кхачадай
кхерсто:кхерстадай
кхето:кхетадай
кхехко:кхехкадай
кхио:кхиадай
кхийдо:кхийдадай
кховдо:кховдадай
кхоло:кхоладай
кхочушдан:кхочушдай
къаго:къагадай
къадо:къададай
къаждан:къаждай
къайладаккха:къайладаккхий
къайладала:къайладалий
къандан:къандай
къардан:къардай
къарзо:къарздай
къасто:къастадай
къахьдан:къахьдай
къеждан:къеждай
къерзо:къерзадай
къесто:къестадай
къехко:къехкадай
къийдан:къийдай
къийзо:къийзадай
къинтӀерадаккха:къинтӀерадаккхий
къинтӀерадала:къинтӀерадалий
къинтӀерадаха:къинтӀерадахий
къинтӀерадийла:къинтӀерадийлий
къинтӀерадовла:къинтӀерадовлий
къовзо:къовзадай
къондан:къондай
къордан:къордай
кӀаддан:кӀаддай
кӀайдан:кӀайдай
кӀамдан:кӀамдай
кӀаргдан:кӀаргдай
кӀегардан:кӀегардаий
кӀегардаккха:кӀегардаккхий
кӀегардаха:кӀегардахий
кӀегардаха:кӀегардахий
кӀегардахка:кӀегардахкий
кӀегардахьа:кӀегардахьий
кӀегардетта:кӀегардеттий
кӀегардийла:кӀегардийлий
кӀегарлалла:кӀегарлаллий
кӀегарлахка:кӀегарлахкий
кӀегарлелла:кӀегарлеллий
кӀегарлехка:кӀегарлехкий
кӀегартатта:кӀегартаттий
кӀегартитта:кӀегартиттий
кӀегартоха:кӀегартохий
кӀегархао:кӀегархаадай
кӀегархаа:кӀегархаий
кӀегархийша:кӀегархийшадай
кӀегархийшо:кӀегархийший
кӀегарховшо:кӀегарховшадай
кӀегаръийза:кӀегаръийзий
кӀегаръоза:кӀегаръозий
кӀелдан:кӀелдаий
кӀелдала:кӀелдалий
кӀелдаха:кӀелдахий
кӀелдахка:кӀелдахкий
кӀелдетта:кӀелдеттий
кӀелдилла:кӀелдиллий
кӀелкхета:кӀелкхетий
кӀелкхийдо:кӀелкхийдадай
кӀелкхийда:кӀелкхийдий
кӀелкхийса:кӀелкхийсий
кӀелкховда:кӀелкховдий
кӀелкхосса:кӀелкхоссий
кӀеллалла:кӀеллаллий
кӀеллатта:кӀеллаттий
кӀеллахка:кӀеллахкий
кӀеллаца:кӀеллаций
кӀеллелха:кӀеллелхий
кӀеллеца:кӀеллеций
кӀелтаса:кӀелтасий
кӀодан:кӀодай
лагӀдан:лагӀдай
лазадаккха:лазадаккхий
лазадала:лазадалий
лакхадаккха:лакхадаккхий
лакхадала:лакхадалий
лакъо:лакъадай
лало:лаладай
лардан:лардай
ласто:ластадай
лато:латадай
латто:латтадай
лахадосса:лахадоссий
лахдан:лахдай
лахьо:лахьадай
лачкъо:лачкъадай
лего:легадай
ледан:ледай
лело:леладай
лелхо:лелхадай
лепо:лепадай
лесто:лестадай
лето:летадай
лехьо:лехьадай
лечкъо:лечкъадай
лийчо:лийчадай
лурдола:лурдолий
маго:магадай
маддан:маддай
маддала:маддалий
маждан:маждай
маждала:маждалий
мазакъдола:мазакъдолий
макхдан:макхдай
мало:маладай
малдан:малдай
малдала:малдалий
марздан:марздай
марздала:марздалий
матардола:матардолий
мацдан:мацдай
мацдала:мацдалий
мекхадола:мекхадолий
мийло:мийладай
мукъадаккха:мукъадаккхий
мукъадала:мукъадалий
мустдан:мустдай
нацкъардаккха:нацкъардаккхий
нацкъардала:нацкъардалий
нацкъардаха:нацкъардахий
нацкъардийла:нацкъардийлий
нацкъардовла:нацкъардовлий
нилхдан:нилхдай
нисдан:нисдай
озо:озадай
олло:олладай
остадаккха:остадаккхий
остадала:остадалий
остадаха:остадахий
остадийла:остадийлий
остадовла:остадовлий
охко:охкадай
охьааха:охьаахий
охьададo:охьадададай
охьадада:охьададий
охьадаккха:охьадаккхий
охьадало:охьадаладай
охьадала:охьадалий
охьадатӀо:охьадатӀадай
охьадата:охьадатӀий
охьадаха:охьадахий
охьадахка:охьадахкий
охьадижо:охьадижадай
охьадижа:охьадижий
охьадийла:охьадийлий
охьадийшо:охьадийшадай
охьадийша:охьадийший
охьадилла:охьадиллий
охьадиссо:охьадиссадай
охьадисса:охьадиссий
охьадожо:охьадожадай
охьадожа:охьадожий
охьадоссо:охьадоссадай
охьадосса:охьадоссий
охьадотта:охьадоттий
охьаидо:охьаидадай
охьаида:охьаидий
охьаийза:охьаийзий
охьакхачо:охьакхачадай
охьакхача:охьакхачий
охьакхета:охьакхетий
охьакхийса:охьакхийсий
охьакхосса:охьакхоссий
охьалалла:охьалаллий
охьалахка:охьалахкий
охьалелла:охьалеллий
охьалелха:охьалелхий
охьалехка:охьалехкий
охьаоза:охьаозий
охьасатто:охьасаттадай
охьасатта:охьасаттий
охьасетто:охьасеттадай
охьасетта:охьасеттий
охьатакхо:охьатакхадай
охьатакха:охьатакхий
охьататта:охьататтий
охьатаӀо:охьатаӀадай
охьатаӀа:охьатаӀий
охьатега:охьатегий
охьатекхо:охьатекхадай
охьатекха:охьатекхий
охьатеIо:охьатеӀадай
охьатеӀа:охьатеӀий
охьатоха:охьатохий
охьахао:охьахаадай
охьхаа:охьахаий
охьахарцо:охьахарцадай
охьахарца:охьахарций
охьахахка:охьахахкий
охьахерцо:охьахерцадай
охьахерца:охьахерций
охьахехка:охьахехкий
охьахийшо:охьахийшадай
охьахийша:охьахийший
охьахило:охьахиладай
охьахила:охьахилий
охьаховшо:охьаховшадай
охьаховша:охьаховший
охьахьажо:охьахьажадай
охьахьажа:охьахьажий
охьахьежо:охьахьежадай
охьахьежа:охьахьежий
охьашардан:охьашардай
охьашаршо:охьашаршадай
охьашарша:охьашарший
охьашершо:охьашершадай
охьашерша:охьашерший
охьаэго:охьаэгадай
охьаэга:охьаэгий
охьаэккхо:охьаэккхадай
охьаэккха:охьаэккхий
охьаэха:охьаэхий
оьгӀаздаха:оьгӀаздахий
оьгӀазъэха:оьгӀазъэхий
паргӀатдаккха:паргӀатдаккхий
паргӀатдаха:паргӀатдахий
паргӀатдийла:паргӀатдийлий
паргӀатдовла:паргӀатдовлий
пхардан:пхардай
резадан:резадай
сагатдан:сагатдай
сагатдала:сагатдалий
садаккха:садаккхий
садала:садалий
садаӀа:садаӀий
садетта:садеттий
садеӀа:садеӀий
сакъерадала:сакъерадалий
сакъера:сакъерий
салаца:салаций
самадаккха:самадаккхий
самадала:самадалий
самсадаккха:самсадаккхий
самукъадаккха:самукъадаккхий
самукъадала:самукъадалий
сатаса:сатасий
сатийса:сатийсий
сатоха:сатохий
сатто:саттадай
сахила:сахилий
сахьийзо:сахьийзадай
сахьийза:сахьийзий
сахьовзо:сахьовзадай
сахьовза:сахьовзий
сацо:сацадай
сендан:сендай
сендала:сендалий
серладаккха:серладаккхий
серладала:серладалий
серладаха:серладахий
сетто:сеттадай
сехьадаккха:сехьадаккхий
сехьадала:сехьадалий
сехьадаха:сехьадахий
сехьадийла:сехьадийлий
сехьадовла:сехьадовлий
сехьакхийса:сехьакхийсий
сехьакхосса:сехьакхоссий
сехьалалла:сехьалаллий
сехьалахка:сехьалахкий
сехьалелла:сехьалеллий
сехьалелхо:сехьалелхадай
сехьалелха:сехьалелхий
сехьалехка:сехьалехкий
сехьаэккхо:сехьаэккхадай
сехьаэккха:сехьаэккхий
сецо:сецадай
сирдан:сирдай
сихдан:сихдай
сихдала:сихдалий
совсо:совсадай
схьаала:схьаалий
схьааха:схьаахий
схьабаха:схьабахий
схьадан:схьадаий
схьадаккха:схьадаккхий
схьадала:схьадалий
схьадала:схьадалий
схьадаха:схьадахий
схьадетта:схьадеттий
схьадеша:схьадеший
схьадийла:схьадийлий
схьадийца:схьадийций
схьадитта:схьадиттий
схьадотта:схьадоттий
схьаийза:схьаийзий
схьакхийдо:схьакхийдадай
схьакхийда:схьакхийдий
схьакхийса:схьакхийсий
схьакховдо:схьакховдадай
схьакховда:схьакховдий
схьакхоссадала:схьакхоссадалий
схьакхосса:схьакхоссий
схьакъада:схьакъадий
схьакъасто:схьакъастадай
схьакъаста:схьакъастий
схьакъеда:схьакъедий
схьакъесто:схьакъестадай
схьакъеста:схьакъестий
схьалалла:схьалаллий
схьалаха:схьалахий
схьалахка:схьалахкий
схьалахьо:схьалахьадай
схьалаца:схьалаций
схьалелла:схьалеллий
схьалелхо:схьалелхадай
схьалелха:схьалелхий
схьалеха:схьалехий
схьалехка:схьалехкий
схьалехьо:схьалехьадай
схьалеца:схьалеций
схьалиста:схьалистий
схьаоза:схьаозий
схьасатто:схьасаттадай
схьасатта:схьасаттий
схьасетто:схьасеттадай
схьасетта:схьасеттий
схьатакхо:схьатакхадай
схьатакха:схьатакхий
схьататта:схьататтий
схьатаӀо:схьатаӀадай
схьатаӀа:схьатаӀий
схьатекхо:схьатекхадай
схьатекха:схьатекхий
схьатеIо:схьатеӀадай
схьатеӀа:схьатеӀий
схьатитта:схьатиттий
схьатоха:схьатохий
схьахарцо:схьахарцадай
схьахарца:схьахарций
схьахахка:схьахахкий
схьахерцо:схьахерцадай
